Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1142.
do enact as follows:AB1142,13Section 1. Fiscal changes.AB1142,1,74(1) In the schedule under s. 20.005 (3) for the appropriation to the department 5of transportation under s. 20.395 (2) (cr), the dollar amount for fiscal year 2026-27 6is increased by $10,000,000 to support passenger rail operations and by $5,200,000 7to fund ongoing passenger rail expansion feasibility studies.AB1142,1,88